Utah statutes.
70A-9a-618.   Rights and duties of certain secondary obligors.

(1)  A secondary obligor acquires the rights and becomes obligated to perform the duties of the secured party after the secondary obligor:

(a)  receives an assignment of a secured obligation from the secured party;

(b)  receives a transfer of collateral from the secured party and agrees to accept the rights and assume the duties of the secured party; or

(c)  is subrogated to the rights of a secured party with respect to collateral.

(2) An assignment, transfer, or subrogation described in Subsection (1):

(a)  is not a disposition of collateral under Section 70A-9a-610; and

(b)  relieves the secured party of further duties under this chapter.



Enacted by Chapter 252, 2000 General Session

